Maine, session 132, LD1248.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4014, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 453, §1, is
amended to read:
D. "Physical escort" means the temporary, voluntary touching or holding of the hand,
wrist, arm, shoulder or back to induce a student to walk to a safe location.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §4014, sub-§1, ¶G-1 is enacted to read:
G-1. "Serious physical injury" means any impairment of the physical condition of a
person, whether self-inflicted or inflicted by someone else, that requires a medical
practitioner, including, but not limited to, a school nurse, to evaluate or treat the person.
This paragraph is repealed August 1, 2029.
Sec. 3. Report. The Department of Education shall, no later than January 1, 2029,
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
education matters related to the use of physical restraint and seclusion in schools under the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 4014. The report must include, but is not
limited to, data on the use of physical restraint and seclusion in schools in the State prior
to October 15, 2025 and after that date and include a summary of any changes to the use of
physical restraint and seclusion between calendar years 2021 and 2028. The joint standing
committee is authorized to report out a bill to the 134th Legislature in 2029.
Page 1 - 132LR1814(03)